California, session 20252026, AB1572.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 33356 is added to the Education Code, immediately following Section 33355, to read:33356. (a) The California Interscholastic Federation shall require its officials to annually register through a platform selected by the California Interscholastic Federation to verify the official’s eligibility to officiate California Interscholastic Federation contests. The platform shall consist of all of the following components:(1) A (A) Until July 1, 2028, a statewide and standardized background screening. (B) Commencing July 1, 2028, a record of a valid Activity Supervisor Clearance Certificate issued by the commission pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 44258.7, including the applicable expiration date.(2) A record of rules tests, online training modules, sport-specific annual certifications, and continuing education requirements.(3) A record of liability insurance coverage.(b) (1) (A) The California Interscholastic Federation shall, through its chosen platform, annually verify that all components listed in paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, of subdivision (a) are complete before an official is deemed and marked as eligible to receive an assignment to officiate.(B) (i) Until July 1, 2028, verification pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall be done annually.(ii) Commencing July 1, 2028, the California Interscholastic Federation shall maintain the platform and, as part of the verification requirement in subparagraph (A), ensure that the platform selected by the California Interscholastic Federation regularly reviews the list published by the commission pursuant to subdivision (c) in order to update the eligibility of the officials whose Activity Supervisor Clearance Certificate has been suspended or revoked.(2) Only officials who are deemed eligible in the selected platform may be assigned to California Interscholastic Federation contests by assignors or officiating associations.(3) The California Interscholastic Federation shall ensure that its participating member schools, school districts, county offices of education, and charter schools can access the platform to verify the eligibility of an official, but shall not have access to the sensitive information in each individual component of the platform.(c) Commencing July 1, 2028, the commission shall regularly publish a list on its internet website of Activity Supervisor Clearance Certificate holders who have their certificate suspended or revoked by the commission.(d) The California Interscholastic Federation shall not be considered an employer of officials.___________________ REVISIONS: Heading—Line 3.___________________